Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-1425
Licensees; sale of tobacco, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products to persons under the age of twenty-one years; penalty.

Any licensee who shall sell, give, or furnish in any way to any person under the age of twenty-one years, or who shall willingly allow to be taken from his or her place of business by any person under the age of twenty-one years, any cigars, tobacco, cigarettes, cigarette material, electronic nicotine delivery systems, or alternative nicotine products is guilty of a Class III misdemeanor. Any officer, director, or manager having charge or control, either separately or jointly with others, of the business of any corporation which violates sections 28-1419, 28-1420 to 28-1429, and 28-1429.03 to 28-1429.07, if he or she has knowledge of such violation, shall be subject to the penalties provided in this section. In addition to the penalties provided in this section, such licensee shall be subject to the additional penalty of a revocation and forfeiture of his, her, their, or its license, at the discretion of the court before whom the complaint for violation of such sections may be heard. If such license is revoked and forfeited, all rights under such license shall at once cease and terminate and a new license shall not be issued until the expiration of the period provided for in section 28-1429.

Laws 1919, c. 180, § 6, p. 402;

C.S.1922, § 9854;

C.S.1929, § 28-1028;

R.S.1943, § 28-1027;

Laws 1957, c. 100, § 3, p. 360;

Laws 1977, LB 40, § 106;

R.R.S.1943, § 28-1027, (1975);

Laws 2014, LB863, § 19;

Laws 2019, LB149, § 8;

Laws 2019, LB397, § 8;

Laws 2020, LB1064, § 6;

Laws 2024, LB1204, § 13.